Tennessee, session 114, SB2349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The department of health shall create an outreach campaign utilizing print,
radio, social media, or television public service announcements, advertisements,
posters, or other materials regarding the ongoing research of Charcot-Marie-Tooth
Disease in Tennessee.
(b) The department of health shall establish and promote a toll-free telephonic or
web-based hotline for a person to report the person's diagnosis of Charcot-Marie-Tooth
Disease or donate to the research of such disease.
(c) The department of health shall include the following categories for the
outreach campaign:
(1) Data portal development and security;
(2) Community outreach and public service announcements;
(3) Honoraria, strategy, and travel;
(4) Materials, toolkits, and media; and
(5) Program evaluation and contingency.
(d) The department of health shall conclude the outreach campaign on July 1,
2027.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2349
012122
- 1 -